New Jersey, session 221, S675.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act: "Adult day care center" means an adult day health care services facility licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), which provides preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, and rehabilitative services under medical and nursing supervision to meet the needs of functionally impaired adult participants for a period of time that does not exceed 12 hours during any calendar day. Adult day care center shall also include any center that provides a community-based group program designed to meet the needs of functionally or cognitively impaired adults through an individual plan of care structured to provide a variety of health, social, and related support services in a protective setting during any part of a day but less than 24 hours. b. To the extent that it is within its capacity, an adult day care center shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the religious dietary needs of individuals who are in the care of the adult day care center. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.